California statutes. Water Code
(a) (1) Consistent with Sections 380, 454.51, 454.52, 454.53, and 454.54 of the Public Utilities Code and this division, if the commission requests the department to procure eligible energy resources, and the department elects to exercise its central procurement function to conduct one or more competitive solicitations or enter into contracts for eligible energy resources pursuant to paragraph (4) of subdivision (a) of Section 454.52 of the Public Utilities Code, the commission, in consultation with the department, shall develop and adopt procedures and requirements that govern competitive procurement by, obligations on, and recovery of costs incurred by the department pursuant to this division.

(2) The commission and
 the department shall establish a procurement group to advise the department on the procurement undertaken pursuant to this division.

(3) The department shall not enter into new contracts pursuant to this division on or after January 1, 2035.

(b) In evaluating the bids received through a solicitation, the department shall consider all of the following:

(1) For eligible energy resources dependent on the development of a project, that project’s viability, including, but not limited to, developer experience, developer financial strength and creditworthiness sufficient to eliminate financing contingencies, and the status of required permits and licenses, including a commitment to submit a consistency certification provided pursuant to the federal Coastal Zone Management Act of 1972 (16 U.S.C. Sec. 1451 et seq.) to the
 California Coastal Commission for offshore wind energy development projects, to the extent required.

(2) The ability to meet in-service dates offered during the solicitation and the ability to meet those in-service dates without escalation in cost.

(3) The useful life of the project.

(4) The capability to supply energy, capacity, and ancillary services at locations, times of day, and for durations that meet the state’s energy resource needs, as determined by the department and the commission.

(5) The bidder’s economic and local community impact, workforce development needs and opportunities, environmental impact mitigation plan, and equipment acquisition and supply chain investment plan.

(6) A plan to contribute to large-scale, regional, or statewide baseline and ongoing monitoring of coastal waters and wildlife, if applicable.

(7) Any other criteria determined by the commission or the department.

(c) Every bid for the development of an eligible energy resource project selected by the department shall include the bidder’s certification that either of the following are true:

(1) The entirety of the construction of the eligible energy resource project is a public work for purposes of Chapter 1 (commencing with Section 1720) of Part 7 of Division 2 of the Labor Code.

(2) The construction of the eligible energy resource project is not in its entirety a public work for which prevailing wages are required to be paid pursuant to
 Article 1 (commencing with Section 1720) of Chapter 1 of Part 7 of Division 2 of the Labor Code, but all construction workers employed on the project will be paid at least the general prevailing rate of per diem wages for the type of work and geographic area, as determined by the Director of Industrial Relations pursuant to Sections 1773 and 1773.9 of the Labor Code, except that apprentices registered in programs approved by the Chief of the Division of Apprenticeship Standards may be paid at least the applicable apprentice prevailing rate. If the eligible energy resource project is subject to this paragraph, for those portions of the eligible energy resource project that are not a public work, all of the following requirements shall apply:

(A) The bidder shall ensure that the prevailing wage requirement is included in all contracts for the performance of all construction work.

(B) All contractors and subcontractors shall pay to all construction workers employed in the construction of the eligible energy resource project at least the general prevailing rate of per diem wages, except that apprentices registered in programs approved by the Chief of the Division of Apprenticeship Standards may be paid at least the applicable apprentice prevailing rate.

(C) All contractors and subcontractors performing construction work on the eligible energy resource project shall employ apprentices at no less than the ratio required in Section 1777.5 of the Labor Code.

(D) Except as specified in subparagraph (F), all contractors and subcontractors performing construction work shall maintain and verify payroll records pursuant to Section 1776 of the Labor Code, make those records available for inspection and copying pursuant to Section 1776 of the Labor Code,
 and furnish those payroll records to the Labor Commissioner pursuant to Section 1771.4 of the Labor Code.

(E) Except as specified in subparagraph (F), the obligation of the contractors and subcontractors to pay prevailing wages and employ apprentices may be enforced by the Labor Commissioner through the issuance of a civil wage and penalty assessment pursuant to Section 1741 of the Labor Code, which may be reviewed pursuant to Section 1742 of the Labor Code, within 18 months after the completion of the project, by an underpaid worker through an administrative complaint or civil action, or by a joint labor-management committee though a civil action pursuant to Section 1771.2 of the Labor Code. If a civil wage and penalty assessment is issued, the contractor, subcontractor, and surety on a bond issued to secure the payment of wages covered by the assessment shall be liable for liquidated damages pursuant to Section 1742.1 of the Labor Code.

(F) Subparagraphs (D) and (E) do not apply if all contractors and subcontractors performing construction work on the eligible energy resource project are subject to a project labor agreement. The project labor agreement shall also include, but not be limited to, all of the following requirements:

(i) Provisions requiring payment of prevailing wages to all construction workers employed in the construction of the eligible energy resource project and for enforcement of that obligation through an arbitration procedure.

(ii) Targeted hiring provisions, including a targeted hiring plan, on a craft-by-craft basis to address job access for local, disadvantaged, or underrepresented workers, as defined by a relevant local agency.

(iii) Apprenticeship use provisions
 that commit all parties to increasing the share of work performed by state-registered apprentices above the state-mandated minimum ratio required in Section 1777.5 of the Labor Code.

(iv) Apprenticeship use provisions that commit all parties to hiring and retaining a certain percentage of state-registered apprentices that have completed the multicraft core preapprenticeship training curriculum described in Section 14005 of the Unemployment Insurance Code.

(d) Every bid for the development of an eligible energy resource project selected by the department shall include the bidder’s certification that a skilled and trained workforce will be used to perform all construction work on the eligible energy resource project, consistent with all of the following requirements:

(1) The bidder shall require in all contracts for
 the performance of work that every contractor and subcontractor at every tier will individually use a skilled and trained workforce to construct the eligible energy resource project.

(2) Every contractor and subcontractor shall use a skilled and trained workforce to construct the eligible energy resource project.

(3) Except as specified in subdivision (c), contractors and subcontractors that fail to use a skilled and trained workforce shall be subject to the penalties provided in Section 2603 of the Public Contract Code. Penalties for a contractor’s or subcontractor’s failure to comply with the requirement to use a skilled and trained workforce may be assessed by the Labor Commissioner within 18 months of completion of the project using the same procedures for issuance of civil wage and penalty assessments pursuant to Section 2603 of the Public Contract Code. Penalties shall be
 paid to the State Public Works Enforcement Fund.

(4) For purposes of this subdivision, a bidder shall be considered to be an “awarding body” under Chapter 2.9 (commencing with Section 2600) of Part 1 of Division 2 of the Public Contract Code. Except as specified in paragraph (5), the bidder shall retain records, including copies of monthly reports, that demonstrate compliance with Chapter 2.9 (commencing with Section 2600) of Part 1 of Division 2 of the Public Contract Code while the eligible energy resource project or contract is being performed and for three years after completion of the eligible energy resource project or contract. The bidder shall submit these records immediately upon request of the commission. When submitted to the commission, these records shall be a public record under the California Public Records Act (Division 10 (commencing with Section 7920.000) of Title 1 of the Government Code) and shall be open to public
 inspection.

(5) Paragraphs (3) and (4) do not apply if all contractors and subcontractors performing work on the eligible energy resource project are subject to a project labor agreement. The project labor agreement shall also include, but not be limited to, all of the following requirements:

(A) Provisions requiring compliance with the skilled and trained workforce requirement and for enforcement of that obligation through an arbitration procedure.

(B) Targeted hiring provisions, including a targeted hiring plan, on a craft-by-craft basis to address job access for local, disadvantaged, or underrepresented workers, as defined by a local agency.

(C) Apprenticeship use provisions that commit all parties to increasing the share of work performed by
 state-registered apprentices above the state-mandated minimum ratio required by Section 1777.5 of the Labor Code.

(D) Apprenticeship use provisions that commit all parties to hiring and retaining a certain percentage of state-registered apprentices that have completed the Multi-Craft Core preapprenticeship training curriculum described in Section 14005 of the Unemployment Insurance Code.

(e) For purposes of this section, the following definitions apply:

(1) “Construction” means any new construction work and subsequent construction and construction maintenance work following initial completion that is contracted out to a contractor in the construction industry, including construction work on a barge, construction staging area, or construction area when being used as a construction work platform and the rigging and
 hoisting of construction materials directly from a barge, construction staging area, or construction area into the construction process for a construction project. “Construction” does not include the loading and unloading of cargo to and from vessels and the movement of cargo to and from vessels at any port facility to the cargo’s point of rest.

(2) “Project labor agreement” has the same meaning as defined in Section 2500 of the Public Contract Code.

(3) “Skilled and trained workforce” has the same meaning as defined in Section 2601 of the Public Contract Code.

(History: Added by Stats. 2023, Ch. 367, Sec. 15.   (AB 1373)   Effective October 7, 2023.)
-------------------------------------------

80821.

(a) (1) When conducting a solicitation pursuant to Section 80820, the department shall confer with the commission and other parties, including local publicly owned electric utilities that are voluntarily participating pursuant to Section 80822 and load-serving entities, for eligible energy resource procurement activities of an identified scope and duration. The department shall recover costs related to conducting the requested solicitations and all supporting work. Cost recovery may be effectuated, if determined to be just and reasonable by the commission before the procurement, through a nonbypassable charge approval process for load-serving entities and pursuant to Section 80822 for local publicly owned electric utilities.

(2) At the request of the department, the commission may require an electrical corporation to act as the agent of the department or to assist the department in conducting the solicitation, bid evaluation, or contract negotiation for new eligible energy resource procurement. The electrical corporation shall be reimbursed by the department for its reasonable costs, as determined by the commission.

(b) If the department’s costs associated with the procurement of eligible energy resources pursuant to this division, including the costs related to bonds issued pursuant to Chapter 5 (commencing with Section 80840), costs related to contracting for eligible energy resources, and other costs to implement and administer this division, will be recovered through a commission proceeding, the commission shall review the procurement undertaken pursuant to this division and, if approved, issue an order governing the recovery of the department’s
 costs before the consummation of the contract only if both of the following conditions are satisfied:

(1) The recovery of the department’s costs, including those costs associated with the procurement process, the resulting transactions, and the associated costs, has been found to be just and reasonable and to be in the public interest.

(2) The recovery of the department’s costs, including, if authorized, costs associated with the issuance of bonds and the material terms of those bonds, including, without limitation, interest rates, rating, amortization, and maturity, through charges on customers does not unreasonably increase costs to customers on a net present value basis.

(c) If the commission determines that a nonbypassable charge necessary to fund activities conducted by the department pursuant to this division
 is just and reasonable, the department shall ensure it has entered into an agreement with the commission for that nonbypassable charge before it begins to incur costs related to a specific activity under this division. If the purpose of the nonbypassable charge is to recover the department’s revenue requirement related to bond issuance debt service, the department shall ensure the agreement has the force and effect of an irrevocable financing order adopted in accordance with Article 5.5 (commencing with Section 840) of Chapter 4 of Part 1 of Division 1 of the Public Utilities Code or that the commission has separately issued an irrevocable financing order related to the nonbypassable charge.

(d) Any agreement between the department and the commission under this section shall provide for the administration of the nonbypassable charge, including both of the following requirements:

(1) The department shall notify the commission each year of the annual collections received by the department and the amount of any excess or deficiency in collections above or below the revenue requirement. The commission shall adjust charges in the subsequent year to reflect that excess or deficiency.

(2) During any period, if the department forecasts that the revenue requirement for that period will not be met and that collections will not be sufficient to fund the revenue requirement established pursuant to Section 80842, the department shall notify the commission in writing and the commission shall act within 60 days of receiving that notice to increase the nonbypassable charge so that the amounts collected during that period are sufficient to meet those obligations.

(e) Any agreement between the department and the commission pursuant to this section that is
 solely for the purpose of imposing a nonbypassable charge to recover the department’s revenue requirement related to bond issuance debt service shall include a provision stating that the commission’s just and reasonable determination with respect to the revenue requirement is in effect for the duration of the bond term.

(History: Added by Stats. 2023, Ch. 367, Sec. 15.   (AB 1373)   Effective October 7, 2023.)
-------------------------------------------

80822.

(a) Pursuant to Section 80820, the department may establish a schedule and mechanism for a local publicly owned electric utility to voluntarily obtain from the department eligible energy resources to be acquired by the department through its central procurement function on a contract-by-contract basis.

(b) In order to voluntarily participate, a local publicly owned electric utility shall commit to the imposition of a nonbypassable charge on its ratepayers sufficient at all times to fund its participation and on terms and conditions as set forth in Section 80826.

(History: Added by Stats. 2023, Ch. 367, Sec. 15.   (AB 1373)   Effective October 7, 2023.)
-------------------------------------------

80822.5.

(a) Load-serving entities shall have a voluntary option to obtain incremental eligible energy resources from the department beyond the amounts allocated to the load-serving entity from procurement pursuant to paragraph (1) of subdivision (a) of Section 80820, subject to the approval of the commission and a specific determination by the commission that sufficient capacity is available to accommodate the request to obtain amounts beyond those allocated to the load-serving entity.

(b) The department, in consultation with the commission, may establish a schedule for load-serving entities to provide advance notice of an intent to obtain incremental eligible energy resources. Any load-serving entity exercising its option to voluntarily
 participate shall be obligated to impose a nonbypassable charge on its ratepayers sufficient to fund its allocated share of the costs of incremental eligible energy resources for the duration of the contract, as determined by the department and approved by the commission, if applicable.

(History: Added by Stats. 2023, Ch. 367, Sec. 15.   (AB 1373)   Effective October 7, 2023.)
-------------------------------------------

80823.

At the request of the department, the commission may order an electrical corporation, or its successor in the performance of a related service, to transmit or provide for the transmission of, and distribute all electricity made available by the department, and, as agent of the department, provide billing, collection, and other related services on terms and conditions that reasonably compensate the electrical corporation for its services and adequately secure payment to the department.

(History: Added by Stats. 2023, Ch. 367, Sec. 15.   (AB 1373)   Effective October 7, 2023.)
-------------------------------------------

80824.

The commission may issue rules regulating the enforcement of the agency function pursuant to Section 80823, including the collection of nonbypassable charges and payment into the fund on behalf of the department.

(History: Added by Stats. 2023, Ch. 367, Sec. 15.   (AB 1373)   Effective October 7, 2023.)
-------------------------------------------

80825.

(a) If the department has executed an agreement with the commission pursuant to subdivision (c) of Section 80821, the department may recover its costs, as a revenue requirement, in the amounts sufficient and at the times necessary to fund the revenue requirement established pursuant to Section 80842, and shall advise the commission and each voluntarily participating local publicly owned electric utility, as the department determines to be appropriate and subject to the terms of the agreement.

(b) For purposes of this division and except as otherwise provided in subdivision (a), the commission’s authority as set forth in Section 451 of the Public Utilities Code shall apply.

(History: Added by Stats. 2023, Ch. 367, Sec. 15.   (AB 1373)   Effective October 7, 2023.)
-------------------------------------------

80826.

(a) A local publicly owned electric utility that voluntarily participates in the department’s central procurement function pursuant to Section 80822 shall enter into an agreement with the department for the revenue requirement to fund its participation and that agreement shall have the force and effect of an irrevocable financing order.

(b) The agreement shall provide for the administration of the revenue requirement, including both of the following:

(1) A requirement that the department annually notify the local publicly owned electric utility of the annual collections received by the department with respect to the revenue requirement and the amount of any excess or deficiency
 in collections above or below the revenue requirement. The local publicly owned electric utility shall adjust charges in the subsequent year to reflect any such excess or deficiency.

 (2) During any revenue requirement period, a requirement that, if the department forecasts that the revenue requirement for that period will not be met and that collections will not be sufficient to fund the revenue requirement established pursuant to Section 80842, the department notify the local publicly owned electric utility in writing and the local publicly owned electric utility shall act within 30 days of receiving that notice to increase the charge so that the amount collected during the period is sufficient to meet those obligations.

(History: Added by Stats. 2023, Ch. 367, Sec. 15.   (AB 1373)   Effective October 7, 2023.)
-------------------------------------------

80827.

All moneys collected by load-serving entities and local publicly owned electric utilities and remitted to the department for any eligible energy resources acquired and sold pursuant to this division, and all moneys paid directly or indirectly to or for the account of the department for any sale, exchange, transfer, or disposition of eligible energy resources acquired pursuant to this division, shall be deposited into the fund.

(History: Added by Stats. 2023, Ch. 367, Sec. 15.   (AB 1373)   Effective October 7, 2023.)
-------------------------------------------

80828.

The department may fix and establish the procedure and charges for the sale or other disposal of eligible energy resources purchased by the department.

(History: Added by Stats. 2023, Ch. 367, Sec. 15.   (AB 1373)   Effective October 7, 2023.)
-------------------------------------------



CHAPTER 4. Eligible Energy Resource Central Procurement Fund [80830. - 80830.]

80830.

(a) There is hereby established in the State Treasury the Eligible Energy Resource Central Procurement Fund. Notwithstanding Section 13340 of the Government Code, all moneys in the fund are continuously appropriated, without regard to fiscal year, to the department for purposes of this division.

(b) All revenues payable to the department pursuant to this division, including proceeds of bonds issued pursuant to Chapter 5 (commencing with Section 80840), shall be deposited into the fund. Notwithstanding any other law, interest accruing on the moneys in the fund shall be deposited into the fund and shall be used for purposes of this division.

(c) The fund, and the moneys in the
 fund, are separate and distinct from any other fund and moneys administered by the department.

(d) Payments from the fund may be made only for the following purposes:

(1) Payment of any bonds or other contractual obligations authorized by this division.

(2) The cost of energy and transmission, scheduling, and other related expenses incurred by the department.

(3) The expenses incurred by the department in administering this division, including costs of personnel, contracts, or arrangements to carry out the department’s duties and responsibilities pursuant to this division.

(e) Obligations authorized pursuant to this division shall be payable solely from the fund. Neither the full faith and
 credit nor the taxing power of the state are, or may be, pledged for any payment under any obligation authorized by this division.

(f) While any obligations of the department incurred pursuant to this division remain outstanding and not fully performed or discharged, the rights, powers, duties, and existence of the department shall not be diminished or impaired in any manner that will adversely affect the interests and rights of the holders of, or parties to, those obligations. The department may include this pledge and undertaking of the state in the department’s obligations.

(History: Added by Stats. 2023, Ch. 367, Sec. 15.   (AB 1373)   Effective October 7, 2023.)
-------------------------------------------



CHAPTER 5. Bonds [80840. - 80842.]

80840.

(a) (1) If the department elects to exercise its central procurement function to conduct one or more competitive solicitations or enter into contracts to procure eligible energy resources pursuant to this division, as authorized by paragraph (4) of subdivision (a) of Section 454.52 of the Public Utilities Code, due to the timing of cost recovery processes, the department may determine that it is necessary or desirable to issue bonds to support activities for the procurement of eligible energy resources pursuant to this division.

(2) Upon making the determination described in paragraph (1), the department may issue bonds for purposes of financing the procurement of eligible energy resources in support of the fund and
 other related expenses incurred by the department pursuant to this division, and subsequent to the department having entered into an agreement with the commission regarding a revenue requirement. Bonds shall not be issued in an amount the debt service on which, to the extent payable from the fund, is estimated by the department to exceed the amounts estimated to be available in the fund for the payment of the bonds.

(b) Before the issuance of bonds in a public offering, the department shall ensure the bonds have an investment grade rating from at least one nationally recognized investment ratings firm and the document authorizing the issuance of the bonds shall provide for repayment from pledged revenues.

(c) The commission shall have an opportunity to review the trust agreement or other documents pursuant to which the bonds are issued and revenues are pledged, and shall consult
 with the department regarding the trust agreement or other documents regarding any relevant considerations of the commission and to ensure its consistency with the revenue requirement agreement between the department and commission.

(d) In addition to any other purposes for which bonds may be issued pursuant to this division, bonds may be issued for the following purposes:

(1) Refunding bonds to obtain a lower interest rate.

(2) Refunding bonds bearing a variable interest rate with bonds bearing interest at a fixed rate.

(3) Refunding bonds if a nationally recognized investment ratings firm reduces or withdraws, or proposes to reduce or withdraw, the rating assigned to securities that are secured by bond insurance policies, credit, or liquidity
 facilities issued by the provider of a bond insurance policy, or a credit or liquidity facility securing the bonds being refunded.

(4) Refunding bonds issued to preserve a federal income tax exemption or to qualify or maintain other federal income tax benefits.

(History: Added by Stats. 2023, Ch. 367, Sec. 15.   (AB 1373)   Effective October 7, 2023.)
-------------------------------------------

80841.

(a) Whenever the director determines that the issuance of bonds is necessary or desirable to accomplish the goals set forth in this division, including financing the procurement of eligible energy resources, the director shall issue a written determination authorizing the issuance of bonds by the department. The department, in consultation with the Department of Finance, shall notify the Chairperson of the Joint Legislative Budget Committee and the chairpersons of the fiscal committees of each house of the Legislature of its written determination. The bonds shall be sold in the manner, and on the terms and conditions, specified in that determination, and the determination may contain or authorize any other provision, condition, or limitation not inconsistent with this division and those provisions as may
 be deemed reasonable and proper for the security of the bondholders. Bonds may mature at the time or times, and bear interest at the rate or rates, which may be fixed or variable and be determined by reference to an index or such other method, and may be federally tax exempt, as specified in the determination. Neither the person executing the determination to issue bonds nor any person executing bonds shall be personally liable therefor or be subject to any personal liability or accountability by reason of the issuance of the bonds.

(b) In the discretion of the department, bonds may be secured by a trust agreement by and between the department and a trustee, which may be any trust company or bank having trust powers within or outside the state, or the Treasurer. Notwithstanding any other law, the Treasurer shall not be deemed to have a conflict of interest by reason of acting as the trustee. The department may enter into contracts or
 arrangements in connection with the issuance and sale of bonds, or with respect to any outstanding bonds for so long as those bonds remain outstanding, as it shall deem to be necessary or desirable for the issuance and further security of the bonds, including, but not limited to, credit enhancement agreements, dealer agreements, purchase contracts, escrow agreements, and similar arrangements.

(c) Bonds shall be legal investments for all trust funds, the funds of all insurance companies, savings and commercial banks, trust companies, executors, administrators, trustees, and other fiduciaries, for state school funds, pension funds, and for any funds that may be invested in county, school, or municipal bonds.

(d) Notwithstanding that bonds may be payable from a special fund, the bonds shall be deemed to be negotiable instruments for all purposes.

(e) Any bonds, and the transfer of and income derived from those bonds, shall at all times be free from taxation of every kind by the state and by the political subdivisions of the state.

(f) Bonds shall not be deemed to constitute a debt or liability of the state or of any political subdivision thereof, other than the department, or a pledge of the full faith and credit of the state or of any such political subdivision, but shall be payable solely from the revenues described in paragraph (1) of subdivision (g). All bonds shall contain a statement to the following effect: “Neither the faith and credit nor the taxing power of the State of California is pledged to the payment of the principal of or interest on this bond.” The issuance of bonds shall not directly or indirectly or contingently obligate the state or any political subdivision thereof to levy or to pledge any form of
 taxation whatever therefor or to make any appropriation for their payment.

(g) (1) The department may pledge and apply all or any part of revenues of any nature whatever accruing to the department, from orders issued, charges imposed, or contracts entered into pursuant to or in furtherance of this division, or the right to receive the same, to the payment or security of any or all of the principal of the bonds or the interest thereon, in the manner and upon terms that the department deems advisable.

(2) (A) It is the intent of the Legislature that any pledge of moneys, revenues, or property made by the department shall be valid and binding from the time when the pledge is made if the commission finds the pledge was just and reasonable, and that the moneys, revenues, or property so pledged and thereafter collected from retail end-use
 customers, or paid directly or indirectly to or for the account of the department, is hereby made, and shall immediately be, subject to the lien of that pledge without any physical delivery thereof or further act.

 (B) It is the intent of the Legislature that the lien of any such pledge shall be valid and binding against all parties having claims of any kind in tort, contract, or otherwise against the department irrespective of whether those parties have notice thereof, and that no resolution or instrument by which the pledge or lien created pursuant to this subdivision is expressed, confirmed, or approved need be filed or recorded in order to perfect the pledge or lien.

(C) It is the intent of the Legislature that this paragraph, in all respects, govern the creation, perfection, priority, and enforcement of any lien created pursuant to this
 division.

(History: Added by Stats. 2023, Ch. 367, Sec. 15.   (AB 1373)   Effective October 7, 2023.)
-------------------------------------------

80842.

(a) The department shall, and in any obligation entered into pursuant to this division may covenant to, at least annually, and more frequently as required, establish and revise revenue requirements sufficient, together with any moneys deposited into the fund, to provide all of the following:

(1) The amounts necessary to pay the principal of, and premium, if any, and interest on, all bonds as and when the same shall become due.

(2) The amounts necessary to pay for electricity purchased by it and to deliver it to purchasers, including the cost of electricity, transmission, scheduling, and other related expenses incurred by the department, or to make payments under any other
 contracts, agreements, or obligations entered into by it pursuant to this division, in the amounts and at the times the same shall become due.

(3) Reserves in amount as may be determined by the department from time to time to be necessary or desirable.

(4) The pooled money investment rate on funds advanced for electricity purchases before the receipt of payment for those purchases by the purchasing entity.

(5) The administrative costs of the department and other state agencies, including the costs and fees for professional services, bond issuance and sale, and other miscellaneous costs, incurred in connection with the issuance of bonds or the administration of this division.

(b) The department shall notify the commission of its revenue requirement
 pursuant to the agreement required pursuant to Section 80821 and that revenue requirement shall be satisfied by the recovery of its costs through a nonbypassable charge.

(History: Added by Stats. 2023, Ch. 367, Sec. 15.   (AB 1373)   Effective October 7, 2023.)
-------------------------------------------



CHAPTER 6. Termination of Authority to Contract [80850. - 80850.]

80850.

(a) On or after January 1, 2035, the department shall not contract under this division for the purchase of electrical power.

(b) This section does not affect the authority of the department to administer contracts entered into before that date or any of the department’s outstanding bond obligations.

(History: Added by Stats. 2023, Ch. 367, Sec. 15.   (AB 1373)   Effective October 7, 2023.)
-------------------------------------------



======================================================================

DIVISION 30. CALCONSERVE WATER USE EFFICIENCY REVOLVING LOAN PROGRAM [81000. - 81046.]



PART 1. General Provisions [81000. - 81005.]

81000.

(a) It is the intent of the Legislature in establishing the CalConserve Water Use Efficiency Revolving Fund to create a sustainable funding source for water use efficiency projects.

(b) It is further the intent of the Legislature that the funds from the CalConserve Water Use Efficiency Revolving Fund be used for the following purposes:

(1) Measurable reductions in urban per capita water use.

(2) Improvements in agricultural water use efficiency and measurable reductions in agricultural water use.

(3) Increased use of recycled water.

(4) Reductions in greenhouse gas emissions and water and energy use.

(c) It is the intent of the Legislature that any public funds made available by this division to private water companies regulated by the Public Utilities Commission should be for the benefit of the ratepayers or the public and not the investors pursuant to oversight by the Public Utilities Commission.

(History: Added by Stats. 2014, Ch. 825, Sec. 2.   (AB 2636)   Effective January 1, 2015.)
-------------------------------------------

81005.

For purposes of this division, the following terms have the following meanings: 

(a) “Fund” means the CalConserve Water Use Efficiency Revolving Fund established pursuant to Section 81020.

(b) “Local agency” means a city, county, city and county, municipal utility district, community services district, sanitary district, sanitation district, water district as defined in Section 20200, public water system as defined in Section 116275 of the Health and Safety Code, or private water company under the jurisdiction of the Public Utilities Commission.

(c) “On-bill financing” means a utility-based method for providing
 low-interest or no-interest financing for water use efficiency improvements through the monthly utility bill.

(d) “Technical assistance” means costs incurred for providing advice, training, or other assistance to local agencies, such as the following:

(1) Conducting specialized studies to identify water conservation opportunities that meet the intent of Section 81000.

(2) Planning of specific remodeling, renovation, repair, replacement, or other projects related to water conservation.

(3) Developing a project proposal for funding from the fund.

(History: Added by Stats. 2014, Ch. 825, Sec. 2.   (AB 2636)   Effective January 1, 2015.)
-------------------------------------------



PART 2. CalConserve Water Use Efficiency Revolving Fund [81020. - 81035.]

81020.

The CalConserve Water Use Efficiency Revolving Fund is hereby created in the State Treasury. Moneys in the fund are available, upon appropriation by the Legislature, to the department for expenditure in accordance with this division. The department is the state agency responsible for administering the fund.

(History: Added by Stats. 2014, Ch. 825, Sec. 2.   (AB 2636)   Effective January 1, 2015.)
-------------------------------------------

81022.

The proceeds of any bonds authorized to be issued and available for the purposes of Section 79157 shall be transferred to the fund and used by the department for loans and grants to local agencies to acquire and construct agricultural water conservation projects consistent with Article 3 (commencing with Section 79157) of Chapter 8 of Division 26.

(History: Added by Stats. 2014, Ch. 825, Sec. 2.   (AB 2636)   Effective January 1, 2015.)
-------------------------------------------

81023.

(a) Consistent with Division 26.7 (commencing with Section 79700), the sum of three million dollars ($3,000,000) of the proceeds of bonds authorized to be issued and available for the purposes of Section 79746 shall be transferred to the fund and used by the department, upon appropriation, for loans for water conservation and water use efficiency projects and programs to achieve urban water use targets developed pursuant to Section 10608.20.

(b) The department may implement this section by providing to a local agency a zero-interest loan.

(c) A local agency that receives a loan pursuant to this section shall
 exercise reasonable efforts to recover the costs of the loan. However, the department may waive up to 10 percent of the repayment amount for costs that could not be recovered by the local agency.

(d) The department and a local agency that is an urban retail water supplier and that receives a loan pursuant to this section may enter into a mutually agreeable schedule for making loan repayments into the fund.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2021, Ch. 115, Sec. 98.   (AB 148)   Effective July 22, 2021.)
-------------------------------------------

81024.

The department may undertake any of the following:
